Louisiana, session 2026, SB60.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 19:2.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2.3. Expropriation for carbon dioxide transport and geologic storage
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-130 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 60
prohibited
A. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, expropriation
by a private entity for the purpose, in whole or in part, of transporting carbon
dioxide by pipeline or the geologic storage of carbon dioxide is prohibited.
B. For the purposes of this Section, "private entity" shall include any
juridical person, including but not limited to domestic, foreign, and alien
associations, business organizations, and legal entities privately owned in whole
or in part; public-private partnerships and private associations, corporations,
or individuals engaged in a cooperative endeavor agreement with the state, its
political subdivisions, or political corporations; and any contractors,
subsidiaries, affiliates, and other entities acting on behalf of or in conjunction
with a private entity.
C. No order, permit, or certificate issued prior to the effective date of this
Section shall confer any right of eminent domain or expropriating authority.
Section 2. R.S. 30:4(C)(17)(a), 1102(A), 1104(A)(1) and the introductory paragraph
of 1104(C), and 1107 are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4. Jurisdiction, duties, and powers of the secretary; rules and regulations
* * *
C. The secretary has authority to make, after notice and hearings as provided
in this Chapter, any reasonable rules, regulations, and orders that are necessary from
time to time in the proper administration and enforcement of this Chapter, including
rules, regulations, or orders for the following purposes:
* * *
(17)(a) To regulate the construction design and operation of pipelines
transmitting carbon dioxide to serve secondary and tertiary recovery projects for
increasing the ultimate recovery of oil or gas, including the issuance of certificates
of public convenience and necessity for pipelines serving such projects approved
hereunder.
* * *
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-130 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 60
§1102. Policy; jurisdiction
A. It is declared to be in the public interest for a public purpose and the
policy of Louisiana that:
(1) Carbon dioxide is a valuable commodity to the citizens of the state.
(2) It is the public policy of Louisiana and the purpose of this Chapter to
provide for a coordinated statewide program related to the transportation and
geologic storage of carbon dioxide and to also fulfill the state's primary
responsibility for responsibilities of assuring compliance with the federal Safe
Drinking Water Act, including any amendments thereto, related to the underground
injection of carbon dioxide, protecting the natural resources of the state, and
safeguarding the individual rights protected by the Constitution of Louisiana.
* * *
§1104. Duties and powers of the secretary; rules and regulations; permits
A. The department's actions under this Chapter shall be directed and
controlled by the secretary. The secretary shall have authority to:
(1) Regulate the development and operation of storage facilities and pipelines
transporting carbon dioxide to storage facilities, including unitization in accordance
with the provisions of R.S. 30:1104.2 and the issuance of certificates of public
convenience and necessity for storage facilities and pipelines in accordance with the
provisions of R.S. 30:1107.
* * *
C. Prior to the use of any reservoir for the storage of carbon dioxide and prior
to the exercise of eminent domain pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 19:2(11) and
R.S. 30:1108 by any person, firm, or corporation having such right under laws of the
state of Louisiana, and as a condition precedent to such use or to the exercise of such
rights of eminent domain pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 19:2(11) and R.S.
30:1108, the secretary, after public hearing pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 30:6,
held in the parish where the storage facility is to be located, shall have found at least
one of the following:
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-130 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 60
* * *
§1107. Certificates of public convenience and necessity; certificate of completion of
injection operations
A.(1) The secretary shall issue a certificate of public convenience and
necessity or a certificate of completion of injection operations to each person
applying therefor if, after a public hearing pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 30:6
held in the parish where the storage facility is to be located, the secretary determines
that it is required by the present or future public convenience and necessity, and such
decision is based upon the following criteria:
(a) The proposed storage facility meets the requirements of R.S. 30:1104(C).
(b) The proposed storage facility meets the requirements of any rules adopted
under this Chapter.
(2) However, if any person has previously been issued a certificate of public
convenience and necessity or a certificate of completion of injection operations by
the secretary, that certificate continues to remain valid and in force.
B. The secretary may issue a certificate of public convenience and necessity
to each transporter of carbon dioxide applying therefor, whether or not such
transporter is also the storage operator for the laying, maintaining, and operating of
a pipeline for the transportation of carbon dioxide to a storage facility, and such
rights necessary and incidental thereto if, after a public hearing pursuant to the
provisions of R.S. 30:6, the secretary determines that it is or will be in the present or
future public interest to do so and finds one of the following:
(1) The applicant requires the use of expropriation due solely to the presence
of absentee owners that cannot be located after a reasonable attempt to do so.
(2) The applicant is or intends to operate as a common carrier.
C. Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection B of this Section, if any
transporter of carbon dioxide has previously been issued a certificate of public
convenience and necessity prior to the effective date of this Subsection, that
certificate shall continue to remain valid and in force.
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-130 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 60
D. The secretary shall issue a certificate of completion of injection operations
to the operator applying therefor if, after a public hearing pursuant to R.S. 30:6, it is
determined that such operator has met all of the conditions required for such
certificate, including the requirements of R.S. 30:1109.
E.B. Notwithstanding any provision of this Chapter or any rule, regulation,
or order issued by the commissioner under this Chapter to the contrary, accepting or
acting pursuant to a certificate of public convenience and necessity or a certificate
of completion of injection operations issued under this Chapter; compliance with the
provisions of this Chapter or with rules, regulations, or orders issued by the secretary
under this Chapter; or voluntarily performing any act which could be required by the
secretary pursuant to this Chapter or rules, regulations, or orders issued by the
secretary under this Chapter shall not have the following consequences:
(1) Cause any storage operator or transporter of carbon dioxide for storage
to become or be classified as a common carrier or a public utility for any purpose
whatsoever.
(2) Subject any storage operator or transporter of carbon dioxide for storage
to any duties, obligations, or liabilities as a common carrier or public utility under
the constitution and laws of this state.
(3) Increase the liability of any storage operator or transporter of carbon
dioxide for storage for any taxes otherwise due to the state of Louisiana in the
absence of any additions or amendments to any tax laws of this state.
Section 3. R.S. 19:2(10) and (11) and R.S. 30:4(C)(17)(b), 1104.2, and 1108 are
hereby repealed in their entirety.
Section 4. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana Landowners
Protection Act".
Section 5. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
Page 5 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-130 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 60
effective on the day following such approval.